District of Columbia statutes.
50-2552

Rules.

(a)

Within 90 days of October 26, 2010, the Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 30-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the rules, in whole or in part, by resolution, within this 30-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed disapproved.

(b)

The rules submitted to the Council shall address the following:

(1)

The application of the requirements of § 50-2551 to streets that are on the boundary of Ward 1;

(2)

The application of the requirements of § 50-2551 to streets that are on the boundary of an ANC;

(3)

The definition of streetscape construction project impact zones as referenced in § 50-2551(b);

(4)

The process for receiving a visitor pass and the hours for the visitor pass programs; and

(5)

The eligibility requirements for who may receive the permit referenced in § 50-2551(a)(3).

Oct. 26, 2010, D.C. Law 18-240, § 3, 57 DCR 7186
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 3 of Residential Parking Protection Pilot Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-159, October 11, 2011, 58 DCR 8883).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3 of Residential Parking Protection Pilot Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-592, November 3, 2010, 57 DCR 10472).
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 19-65 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
“(a) Within 90 days of the effective date of the Residential Parking Protection Pilot Temporary Amendment Act of 2011, passed on 2nd reading on September 20, 2011 (Enrolled version of Bill 19-449), the Mayor, pursuant to Title 1 of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this act. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 30-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the rules, in whole or in part, by resolution, within the 30-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.”.
Section 2 of D.C. Law 19-65 amended subsec. (a) to read as follows:
This section is referenced in § 50-2551.